src/morphology/stems/punctuation.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

LEXICON Punctuation

! Clause boundary symbols

    %,+CLB:%,     # ;
    %.+CLB:%.     # ;
  %.%.+CLB:%.%.   # ;
%.%.%.+CLB:%.%.%. # ;
    %:+CLB:%:     # ;
    %;+CLB:%;     # ;
 ^excl+CLB:%!     # ;
 ^pipe+CLB:%|     # ;
    %?+CLB:%?     # ;
     …+CLB:…      # ;
     ¿+CLB:¿      # ; ! Only seen as noise.
     ¶+CLB:¶      # ; ! This sign is for titles, it is introduced by the
                      ! ccat script, and may be changed if it interferes 
                      ! with real pilcrow signs.

! Miscellaneous symbols, abbreviation symbols
! (could be moved to abbr-sme-lex.txt) 
  
 §+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:§  PUNCTconnector ; ! §:s
§§+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:§§ PUNCTconnector ; ! §§:ain
 $+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:$  PUNCTconnector ; ! $:s
 €+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:€  PUNCTconnector ; ! €:s
 £+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:£  PUNCTconnector ; ! €:s

! Single punctuation marks

  √+PUNCT:√   # ;
  ◊+PUNCT:◊   # ;
  •+PUNCT:•   # ;
  ●+PUNCT:●   # ;
  ·+PUNCT:·   # ;
   ּ+PUNCT:ּ    # ;
  ·+PUNCT:·   # ;
  -+PUNCT:-   # ;
 --+PUNCT:--  # ;
  –+PUNCT:–   # ; !endash
  —+PUNCT:—   # ; !emdash
  −+PUNCT:−   # ; !  
  =+PUNCT:=   # ;
 %%+PUNCT:%%  # ;
  &+PUNCT:&   # ;
 %"+PUNCT:%"  # ;
  '+PUNCT:'7  # ;   ! We use "'7" to avoid the CG symbol of ái'gi etc.
 %*+PUNCT:%*  # ;
  ++PUNCT:+   # ;
  `+PUNCT:`   # ;
  ´+PUNCT:´   # ;
  /+PUNCT:/   # ; 
+/-+PUNCT:+/- # ;
 %~+PUNCT:%~  # ;

! Paired punctuation marks

 «+PUNCT+LEFT:«7     # ;
 »+PUNCT+RIGHT:»7    # ;
%“+PUNCT+LEFT:%“     # ;
%”+PUNCT+RIGHT:%”    # ;
%‘+PUNCT+LEFT:%‘     # ;
%’+PUNCT+RIGHT:%’    # ;
%‹+PUNCT+LEFT:%‹     # ;
%›+PUNCT+RIGHT:%›    # ;
%(+PUNCT+LEFT:%(     # ;
%)+PUNCT+RIGHT:%)    # ;
%[+PUNCT+LEFT:%[     # ;
%]+PUNCT+RIGHT:%]    # ;
%{+PUNCT+LEFT:%{     # ;
%}+PUNCT+RIGHT:%}    # ;
%<+PUNCT+LEFT:%[%<%] # ;
%>+PUNCT+LEFT:%[%>%] # ;


LEXICON PUNCTconnector
 +Sg+Nom:   K         ; ! §
!+Sg+Gen:   K         ; ! §
!+Sg+Acc:   K         ; ! §
            PUNCTsuff ; ! §as
        :%: PUNCTsuff ; ! §:as
        :%- PUNCTsuff ; ! §-as  ! Perhaps.
        :%' PUNCTsuff ; ! §'as  ! Perhaps.
 
LEXICON PUNCTsuff
!             K ; ! § 14 (no case on the bare §). Oh, yes. Case.
 +Sg+Gen:     K ; ! §:a  (case suffix on the rest, in case of explicit
 +Sg+Gen:a    K ; ! §:a  (case suffix on the rest, in case of explicit
 +Sg+Acc:av   K ; !       suffix)
 +Sg+Ill:aj   K ;
 +Sg+Ine:n    K ;
 +Sg+Ine:an   K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s    K ; ! §:s
 +Sg+Ela:as   K ; ! §:as
 +Sg+Com:in   K ;
    +Ess:an   K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a    K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aj   K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ajt  K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ajda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ajn  K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ajs  K ;
 +Pl+Com:aj   K ;
